midterm/test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %<perf%>

%<o_sg1%> %<o_sg2%> %<o_sg3%>
%<o_pl1%> %<o_pl2%> %<o_pl3%>

%<s_sg1%> %<s_sg2%> %<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%> %<s_pl2%> %<s_pl3%>

%<v%> %<tv%>

%>

LEXICON root
object ;

LEXICON object
xi:xi subject ;
xin:xin subject ;
xat:xat subject ;
x:x subject ;
xoj:xoj subject ;
xix:xix subject ;
xe:xe subject ;

LEXICON subject
nu:nu stem ; 
a:a stem ;
ru:ru stem ;
u:u stem ;
tu:tu stem ;
qa:qa stem ;
ni:ni stem ;
i:i stem ; 
'i:'i stem ;
ki:ki stem ;

LEXICON stem
tz'ät:tz'ät # ;
